District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “PACE Clarification Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 1104 of the School Based Budgeting and Accountability Act of 1998,
effective March 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-175; D.C. Official Code § 38-2803), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (b)(2)(F) is amended as follows:
(1) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.

(3) A new sub-subparagraph (iii) is added to read as follows:
“(iii) The facility’s status as a historic landmark, designation, or
contribution within a historic district;”.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by adding a new sub-subparagraph (iv)
read as follows:
“(iv) DCPS shall not exercise discretion to calculate prioritization
scores in a manner that does not include the prioritization of all school facilities in its portfolio.”.
(B) Subparagraph (C) is amended to read as follows:
“(C) By September 30, 2017, and every 5 years thereafter, DCPS shall
transmit to the Council all of the prioritization scores and raw data; provided, that beginning with
the September 30, 2027, report, DCPS shall also include a priority ranking for each school in its
portfolio. DCPS shall make the information publicly available online.”.
(2) Paragraph (4) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (D) is added to read as
follows:
“(D) By September 30, 2027, and every 5 years thereafter, DCPS, in
coordination with the Office of Planning and Department of General Services, shall provide a
current school facility inventory of facilities with a historic landmark, historic designation, or
contribution within historic district and publish appropriate modernization procedures, including an
analysis of:
“(i) All laws and regulations governing the maintenance of the
facility;


“(ii) A list of limitations on structural improvements; and
“(iii) Any applicable legal or regulatory restrictions to pursuant to the Historic
Landmark and Historic District Protection Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-144;
D.C. Official Code § 6-1101 et seq.)”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as provided
in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).